Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-3304
Notice; given or posted by whom.

Whenever any notice is to be given or posted pursuant to the provisions of sections 19-3301 to 19-3326 and the officer to give or post notice is not designated, the notice shall be given or posted by the city engineer. Any notice or posting shall not be invalidated because given or done by an officer other than those whose duty it is to give the notice or perform the posting.

Laws 1967, c. 60, § 4, p. 200;

R.S.Supp.,1967, § 16-815;

Laws 1969, c. 88, § 4, p. 439.